Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. NEW SECTION . 321.183A Citizenship and immigration status verification. 1. The department shall use the SAVE program, or any successor federal verification system, to verify the United States citizenship and immigration status of each person who applies for issuance or renewal of a driverâs license or nonoperatorâs identification card and who does not provide proof that the person is a United States citizen. The department shall not issue or renew a driverâs license or nonoperatorâs identification card if the person does not provide proof the person is a United States citizen and the department is unable to verify the personâs status as lawfully present in the United States. 2. For purposes of this section, âSAVE programâ means the systematic alien verification for entitlements system of the United States department of homeland security and the United States citizenship and immigration services. Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies on and after March 1, 2027, or the date the department of transportation submits to the Iowa administrative code editor for publication in the Senate File 2187, p. 2 Iowa administrative bulletin a statement by the director of transportation that the applicable phase of the department of transportationâs new records system is implemented, whichever is earlier. The department shall also forward a copy of the statement to the Iowa Code editor. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 2187, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor